Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6109
Policyholders' vote.

Within forty-five days after the date of the director's initial determination of approval pursuant to section 44-6108, unless extended by the director for good cause, the mutual insurer shall hold a meeting of its policyholders at a reasonable time and place to vote upon the plan of conversion. The mutual insurer shall give notice at least thirty days before the time fixed for the meeting, by first-class mail to the last-known address of each policyholder, that the plan of conversion will be voted upon at a regular or special meeting of the policyholders, which notice shall include a brief description of the plan of conversion and a statement that the director has initially approved the plan of conversion. The notice mailing to each policyholder shall also include a written proxy permitting the policyholder to vote for or against the plan of conversion. The entity to which any group insurance policy is issued, and not any person covered under the group insurance policy, shall be considered the policyholder for purposes of voting. A plan of conversion shall be approved only if not less than two-thirds of the policyholders voting in person or by proxy at the meeting vote in favor of such plan of conversion. Each policyholder shall be entitled to only one vote regardless of the number of policies owned by the policyholder. The director shall supervise and direct the conduct of the vote on the plan of conversion as necessary to ensure that the vote is fair and consistent with the requirements of this section. The director shall enter a final order approving the application to convert to a stock insurer within ten days after receiving a valid certification from the mutual insurer setting forth the vote and certifying that the plan of conversion was approved by not less than two-thirds of the policyholders voting in person or by proxy on the plan of conversion. In such event, the director shall also publish notification of the issuance of the final order in a legal newspaper in Lancaster County and in the county of domicile of the mutual insurer if different than Lancaster County.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 49;

Laws 1997, LB 52, § 7.